District of Columbia statutes.
2-1322

Composition.

The Commission shall consist of 15 public (voting) members appointed by the Mayor. There shall also be the following ex-officio nonvoting members: The Directors of the Department of Human Services, Department of Housing and Community Development, Department of Recreation, Department of Transportation, Department of Manpower, the librarian of the District of Columbia Public Library, the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department, and the Director of the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 402, 23 DCR 2543
June 12, 1999, D.C. Law 12-285, § 4(j), 46 DCR 1355

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2322.
1973 Ed., § 6-1922.

Prior Codifications

For temporary amendment of section, see § 4(j) of the Confirmation Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-25, March 15, 1999, 46 DCR 2971).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(j) of the Confirmation Act Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-92, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5330).

Emergency Legislation

Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”

References in Text

The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.

The functions of the Department of Licenses, Investigations, and Inspections were transferred to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs, by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983.

Transfer of Functions